Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF4505.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 206.845, subdivision 2, is amended to read: Subd. 2. Transmission to central reporting location. After the close of the polls, the head election judge must create a printed record of the results of the election for that precinct. After the record has been printed, the deleted text begin head election judge in a precinct that employs automatic tabulating equipment may transmit the accumulated tally for each device to a central reporting location using a telephone, modem, Internet, or other electronic connection. During the canvassing period, the results transmitted electronically must be considered unofficial until the canvassing board has performed a complete reconciliation of the resultsdeleted text end new text begin election judges must transfer the record of the results by disk, tape, or other physical means of communication to the central reporting locationnew text end . Sec. 2. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 206.89, subdivision 3, is amended to read: Subd. 3. Scope and conduct of review. new text begin (a) new text end The county canvassing board shall appoint the postelection review official as defined in subdivision 1. The postelection review must be conducted of the votes cast for president or governor; United States senator; and United States representative. The postelection review official may conduct postelection review of the votes cast for additional offices. new text begin (b) new text end The postelection review must be conducted in public at the location where the voted ballots have been securely stored after the state general election or at another location chosen by the county canvassing board. The postelection review official for each precinct selected must conduct the postelection review and may be assisted by election judges designated by the postelection review official for this purpose. The party balance requirement of section 204B.19 applies to election judges designated for the review. The postelection review must consist of a manual count of the ballots used in the precincts selected and must be performed in the manner provided by section 204C.21. The postelection review must be conducted in the manner provided for recounts under section 204C.361 to the extent practicable.new text begin The postelection review must count a precinct's absentee and early voted ballots separately from the ballots cast in the precinct's polling place on election day.new text end The review must be completed no later than one day before the meeting of the state canvassing board to certify the results of the state general election. Sec. 3. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 206.89, subdivision 4, is amended to read: Subd. 4. Standard of acceptable performance by voting system. A comparison of the results compiled by the voting system with the postelection review described in this section must show that the results of the electronic voting system differed from the manual count of the offices reviewed by no more than two votes in a precinct where fewer than 1,200 voters cast ballots, three votes in a precinct where between 1,200 and 1,599 voters cast ballots, four votes in a precinct where between 1,600 and 1,999 voters cast ballots, or five votes in a precinct where 2,000 or more voters cast ballots.new text begin The performance of a voting system used to tabulate a precinct's absentee and early voted ballots must be reviewed separately from the voting system used to tabulate the ballots cast in the precinct's polling place on election day. Each system is separately subject to the performance standard required by this subdivision based on the number of ballots tabulated using that system.new text end Valid votes that have been marked by the voter outside the vote targets or using a manual marking device that cannot be read by the voting system must not be included in making the determination whether the voting system has met the standard of acceptable performance for any precinct.